Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administrative fund" means the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund created under RCW 41.24.030.

(2) "Appropriate legislation" means an ordinance when an ordinance is the means of legislating by any municipality, and resolution in all other cases.

(3) "Board of trustees" or "local board" means: (a) For matters affecting firefighters, a firefighter board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.060; (b) for matters affecting an emergency worker, an emergency medical service district board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.330; or (c) for matters affecting reserve officers, a reserve officer board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.460.

(4) "Emergency worker" means any emergency medical service personnel, regulated by chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, who is a member of an emergency medical service district but shall not include emergency medical service personnel who are eligible for participation in the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.

(5) "Fire department" means any regularly organized fire department or emergency medical service district consisting wholly of volunteer firefighters, or any part-paid and part-volunteer fire department duly organized and maintained by any municipality: PROVIDED, That any such municipality wherein a part-paid fire department is maintained may by appropriate legislation permit the full-paid members of its department to come under the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW.

(6) "Firefighter" includes any firefighter or emergency worker who is a member of any fire department of any municipality but shall not include firefighters who are eligible for participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.

(7) "Municipal corporation" or "municipality" includes any county, city, town or combination thereof, fire protection district, local law enforcement agency, or any emergency medical service district or other special district, authorized by law to protect life or property within its boundaries through a fire department, emergency workers, or reserve officers.

(8) "Participant" means:

(a) For the volunteer firefighters' plan:

(i) For purposes of relief, any firefighter or emergency worker; and

(ii) For purposes of retirement pension, any firefighter or emergency worker who is or may become eligible to receive a benefit of any type under the retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose beneficiary may be eligible to receive any such benefit; and

(b) For the reserve officers' plan:

(i) For purposes of relief, any reserve officer who is or may become eligible for relief under this chapter; and

(ii) For purposes of retirement pension, any reserve officer who is or may become eligible to receive a benefit of any type under the retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose beneficiary may be eligible to receive any such benefit.

(9) "Performance of duty" or "performance of service" shall be construed to mean and include any work in and about company quarters, any fire station, any law enforcement office or precinct, or any other place under the direction or general orders of the chief or other officer having authority to order such member to perform such work; performing other officially assigned duties that are secondary to his or her duties as a firefighter, emergency worker, or reserve officer such as maintenance, public education, inspections, investigations, court testimony, and fund-raising for the benefit of the department; being on call or on standby under the orders of the chief or designated officer of the department, except at the individual's home or place of business; responding to, working at, or returning from an alarm of fire, emergency call, or law enforcement duties; drill or training; or any work performed of an emergency nature in accordance with the rules and regulations of the fire department or local law enforcement agency.

(10) "Principal fund" means either the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund created under RCW 41.24.030 or the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund created in RCW 41.24.030(2).

(11) "Relief" means all medical, death, and disability benefits available under this chapter that are made necessary from death, sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of duty, including benefits provided under RCW 41.24.110, 41.24.150, 41.24.160, 41.24.175, 41.24.220, and 41.24.230, but does not include retirement pensions provided under this chapter.

(12) "Reserve officer" means the same as defined by the Washington state criminal justice training commission under chapter 43.101 RCW, but shall not include enforcement officers who are eligible for participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.

(13) "Retired participant" means any participant who is at least sixty-five years of age and has been retired by the board of trustees under RCW 41.24.170 and has been in receipt of a monthly pension for no less than three months.

(14) "Retirement pension" means retirement payments for the performance of service, as provided under RCW 41.24.170, 41.24.172, 41.24.175, 41.24.180, and 41.24.185.

(15) "State board" means the state board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers.

[ 2023 c 73 s 5. Prior: 2010 c 60 s 2; 2006 c 26 s 1; 2005 c 37 s 1; 1999 c 148 s 1; 1995 c 11 s 1; 1993 c 331 s 1; 1989 c 91 s 8; 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 18; 1955 c 263 s 1; 1945 c 261 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-15.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 73: See note following RCW 41.24.800.

Effective date—1989 c 91: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1989." [ 1989 c 91 s 27.]

Construction—Saving—1955 c 263: "Any provisions of chapter 41.24 RCW inconsistent with the provisions of this act are hereby repealed: PROVIDED, That such repeal shall not affect any act or proceeding had or pending, under such provision repealed, but the same shall be construed and prosecuted as though such provision had not been repealed." [ 1955 c 263 s 12.]

Severability—1945 c 261: "If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the act, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby. If any section, subsection, sentence, clause or phrase of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this act. The legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act and each section, subsection, clause and phrase thereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more of the other sections, subsections, sentences, clauses and phrases be declared unconstitutional." [ 1945 c 261 s 26.]

Construction—Saving—1945 c 261: "Chapter 121, Laws of 1935 (sections 9578-1 to 9578-11, inclusive, Remington's Revised Statutes, also Pierce's Perpetual Code 773-37 to -57), is hereby repealed: PROVIDED, That such repeal shall not be construed as affecting any act done or right acquired, or obligation incurred, or proceedings had or pending, under said act repealed, but the same shall be continued and prosecuted as though such act had not been repealed." [ 1945 c 261 s 27.]

Fire protection district having full paid fire department: RCW 41.16.240.